Missouri, session 2026, HB2736.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 115.133 and 115.135, RSMo, are repealed and two new sections
enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 115.133 and 115.135, to read as follows:
115.133. 1. Except as provided in subsection 2 of this section, any citizen of the
United States who is a resident of the state of Missouri and seventeen years and six months of
age or older shall be entitled to register and to vote in any election which is held on or after
his eighteenth birthday.
2. No person who is adjudged incapacitated shall be entitled to register or vote. No
person shall be entitled to vote:
(1) While confined under a sentence of imprisonment;
(2) While on probation or parole after conviction of a felony, until finally discharged
from such probation or parole; or
(3) After conviction of a felony or misdemeanor connected with the right of suffrage.
3. Except as provided in federal law or federal elections and in [section] sections
115.135 and 115.277, no person shall be entitled to vote if the person has not registered to
vote in the jurisdiction of his or her residence prior to [the deadline to register to vote] voting.
115.135. 1. Any person who is qualified to vote, or who shall become qualified to
vote on or before the day of election, shall be entitled to register in the jurisdiction within
which he or she resides. In order to vote in any election for which registration is required, a
person must be registered to vote [in the state of Missouri no later than 5:00 p.m., or the
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2736 2
normal closing time of any public building where the registration is being held if such time is
later than 5:00 p.m., on the fourth Wednesday prior to the election, unless the voter is an
interstate former resident, a new resident, or a covered voter, as defined in section 115.275]
on or before the day of election. The person registering to vote may register to vote at
any location for voter registration established by the secretary of state, at any location
for voter registration established by the election authority of the jurisdiction where the
voter resides, or the voter's assigned polling place on or before the day of election. Any
person registering after such date shall be eligible to vote in subsequent elections.
2. A person applying to register with an election authority or a deputy registration
official shall identify himself or herself by presenting a copy of a birth certificate, a Native
American tribal document, other proof of United States citizenship, a valid Missouri drivers
license or other form of personal identification at the time of registration.
3. Except as provided in federal law or federal elections and in section 115.277, no
person shall be entitled to vote [if the person has not registered to vote in the jurisdiction of
his or her residence] in an election unless such person is eligible and properly registered
to vote prior to casting his or her ballot in such election.
[4. A covered voter as defined in section 115.275 who has been discharged from
military service, has returned from a military deployment or activation, or has separated from
employment outside the territorial limits of the United States after the deadline to register to
vote, and who is otherwise qualified to register to vote, may register to vote in an election in
person before the election authority until 5:00 p.m. on the Friday before such election. Such
persons shall produce sufficient documentation showing evidence of qualifying for late
registration pursuant to this section.]
✔